test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-laskma84_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `laskma: # Verb (84) `laskma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     laskma+V+Inf/mA: laskma
     laskma+V+Inf: laskõq
     laskma+V+Act+PrfPrc: lasknuq
     laskma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [last, lastu]

     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lasõ
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [lasõt, lasõdõq]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lask
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lasõmiq
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lasõtiq
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: laskvaq
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: lasõ
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [lasi, lasksõ]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [lasit, lasiq, lasidõq, lasksõt, lasksõq, lasksõdõq]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [lasḱ, lasksõ]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lasimiq, lasksõmiq]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lasitiq, lasksõtiq]
     laskma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lasiq, lasivaq, lasksõq, lasksõvaq]

     laskma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lasta
     laskma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lastas

     laskma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: laskva

     laskma+V+Jus: laskuq
